Alaska statutes. Title 9. Code of Civil Procedure.
Article 6. Medical Malpractice Actions.

Cross references. —

For damages, see AS 09.17; for wrongful death actions, see AS

09.55.580

; for immunities, see AS 09.65.

Sec. 09.55.530.
Declaration of purpose.

The legislature considers that there is a need in Alaska to codify the law with regard to medical liability in order to establish that the law in Alaska in this regard is the same as elsewhere.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1967)

Sec. 09.55.535.
Voluntary arbitration.

A patient and any health care provider may execute an agreement to submit to arbitration any dispute, controversy, or issue arising out of care or treatment by the health care provider during the period that the agreement is in force or that has already arisen between the parties. Execution of an agreement under this subsection by a patient may not be made a prerequisite to receipt of care or treatment by the health care provider.

An agreement to arbitrate executed before care or treatment is provided must clearly provide in bold print on the face of the agreement that execution of the agreement by the patient is not a prerequisite to receiving care or treatment. If this subsection is not complied with by the health care provider, the agreement to arbitrate is void. The form to be used shall be approved in advance by the attorney general of the state to assure it fairly informs both parties to the agreement and properly protects their interests.

The agreement must provide that the person receiving health care may revoke the agreement within 30 days after execution by notifying the health care provider in writing. The period for revocation shall be tolled during any period that the person receiving health care is physically unable to execute a revocation. The health care provider may not revoke the agreement after its execution.

An arbitration agreement entered into by the parents or legal guardian of a minor person receiving health care is binding upon the minor person.

An agreement to arbitrate between a patient and a hospital must be reexecuted each time a person is admitted to a hospital. The agreement may be extended by written agreement of all parties to apply to care after hospitalization. A person receiving outpatient care from a hospital or clinic or a member of a health maintenance organization may execute an agreement with the hospital that provides for continuation of the agreement for a continuing program of treatment or during continued membership.

Upon the filing of a malpractice claim that is subject to an agreement to arbitrate, the claim shall be submitted to an arbitration board. The arbitration board shall consist of three arbitrators: one arbitrator designated by the claimant or claimants, one arbitrator designated by the health care provider or providers against whom the claim is made, and a third arbitrator designated by mutual agreement who shall serve as chairperson of the board. If the parties cannot agree on the third person, the court will provide a choice of three or more persons who might serve as chairperson of the arbitration board, which shall be from a list of qualified arbitrators furnished by the attorney general. Claimant or claimants together and health care provider or providers together may each strike one or more names so that after each side has done so at least one name remains, providing a basis for the final selection by the court.

The attorney general shall prepare a list of persons consisting of lawyers or other persons qualified to serve as chairperson of an arbitration board. They shall be selected on the basis of their technical expertise, judicial temperament, and capability of impartially acting on malpractice claims. The attorney general shall submit a list of at least three names whenever requested to do so by the court along with detailed biographical information on each person listed.

Each member of the arbitration board shall receive reasonable compensation to be paid by the court based on the extent and duration of services rendered. The court shall pay the costs of expert witnesses called by the board and the costs of expert witnesses called by the parties to the arbitration up to a maximum of three witnesses for each side and $150 per day for each expert witness.

The arbitration board may appoint an expert advisory panel, with the powers of the expert advisory panel under AS

09.55.536

, to advise the board on the medical facts of the case.

The court shall specify the shortest practical deadline for completion of the work of the arbitration board, taking into account all the circumstances and the nature of the case.

The provisions of AS

09.43.010

—

09.43.180

(Uniform Arbitration Act) or AS

09.43.300

—

09.43.595

(Revised Uniform Arbitration Act) apply as provided in AS

09.43.010

and

09.43.300

to arbitrations under this section if they do not conflict with the provisions of this section; arbitrations under this section shall be conducted in accordance with procedures established by any rules of court that may be adopted and according to provisions of AS

09.55.540

—

09.55.548

,

09.55.554

—

09.55.560

, and AS

09.65.090

.

History.

(§ 33 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 170 SLA 2004; am § 6 ch 22 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For purpose of 1978 Act, see § 1, ch. 177, SLA 1978, as amended by § 8, ch. 46, SLA 1982, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, added “the” after “selected on” in the second sentence of (g).

Collateral references. —

Arbitration of medical malpractice claims, 84 ALR3d 375.

Sec. 09.55.536.
Expert advisory panel.

In an action for damages due to personal injury or death based upon the provision of professional services by a health care provider, including a person providing services on behalf of a governmental entity, when the parties have not agreed to arbitration of the claim under AS

09.55.535

, the court shall appoint within 20 days after the filing of an answer to a summons and complaint a three-person expert advisory panel unless the court decides that an expert advisory opinion is not necessary for a decision in the case. When the action is filed, the court shall, by order, determine the professions or specialties to be represented on the expert advisory panel, giving the parties the opportunity to object or make suggestions.

The expert advisory panel may compel the attendance of witnesses, interview the parties, physically examine the injured person if alive, consult with the specialists or learned works they consider appropriate, and compel the production of and examine all relevant hospital, medical, or other records or materials relating to the health care in issue. The panel may meet in camera, but shall maintain a record of any testimony or oral statements of witnesses, and shall keep copies of all written statements it receives.

Not more than 30 days after selection of the panel, the panel shall make a written report to the parties and to the court, answering the following questions and other questions submitted to the panel by the court in sufficient detail to explain the case and the reasons for the panel’s answers:

Why did the claimant seek medical care?

Was a correct diagnosis made? If not, what was incorrect about the diagnosis?

Was the treatment or lack of treatment appropriate? If not, what was inappropriate about the treatment or lack of treatment?

Was the claimant injured during the course of evaluation or treatment or by failure to diagnose or treat?

If the answer to question 4 is “yes,” what is the nature and extent of the medical injury?

What specifically caused the medical injury?

Was the medical injury caused by unskillful care? Explain.

If a medical injury had not occurred, what would have been the likely outcome of the medical case?

In any case in which the answer to one or more of the questions submitted to the panel depends upon the resolution of factual questions that are not the proper subject of expert opinion, the report must so state and may answer questions based upon hypothetical facts that are fully set out in the opinion. The report must include copies of all written statements, opinions, or records relied upon by the panel and either a transcription or other record of any oral statements or opinions; must specify any medical or scientific authority relied upon by the panel; and must include the results of any physical or mental examination performed on the plaintiff. Each member shall sign the report and the signature constitutes the member’s adoption of all statements and opinions contained in it; however, a member may, instead of signing the report, submit a concurring or dissenting report that complies with the requirements of this subsection. A member may not attest to any portion of the report as to which the member is not qualified to give expert testimony.

The report of the panel with any dissenting or concurring opinion is admissible in evidence to the same extent as though its contents were orally testified to by the person or persons preparing it. The court shall delete any portion that would not be admissible because of lack of foundation for opinion testimony, or otherwise. Either party may submit testimony to support or refute the report. The jury shall be instructed in general terms that the report shall be considered and evaluated in the same manner as any other expert testimony. Any member of the panel may be called by any party and may be cross-examined as to the contents of the report or of that member’s dissenting or concurring opinion.

Discovery may not be undertaken in a case until the report of the expert advisory panel is received or 60 days after selection of the panel, whichever occurs first. However, the court may relax this prohibition upon a showing of good cause by any party. If the panel has not completed its report within the 30-day period prescribed in (c) of this section, the court may, upon application, grant the panel an additional 30 days.

Members of a panel are entitled to travel expenses and per diem in accordance with state law pertaining to members of boards and commissions for all time spent in preparing its report. If a panel member is called upon as a witness at trial or upon deposition, the member is entitled to payment of an expert witness fee, which may not exceed $150 per day. All expenses incurred by the panel shall be paid by the court. However, in any case in which the court determines that a party has made a patently frivolous claim or a patently frivolous denial of liability, it shall order that all costs of the expert advisory panel be borne by the party making that claim or denial.

Parties to the case and their counsel may not initiate communication out of court with members of the panel on the subject matter of its inquiry and report or cause or solicit others to do so, except through ordinary discovery proceedings.

This section applies regardless of whether a party in the action or the health care provider whose professional services are the subject of the action is a governmental entity or in the public or private sector.

History.

(§ 33 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 23 ch 177 SLA 1978; am §§ 22 — 25 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 4 ch 12 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “Discovery may not” was substituted for “No discovery may” in (f) of this section to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For purpose of 1978 Act, see § 1, ch. 177, SLA 1978, as amended by § 8, ch. 46, SLA 1982, in the Temporary and Special Acts.

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”

Sec. 09.55.540.
Burden of proof.

In a malpractice action based on the negligence or wilful misconduct of a health care provider, the plaintiff has the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence

that the plaintiff had a health care provider-patient relationship with the defendant at the time of the act complained of;

the degree of knowledge or skill possessed or the degree of care ordinarily exercised under the circumstances, at the time of the act complained of, by health care providers in the field or specialty in which the defendant is practicing;

that the defendant either lacked this degree of knowledge or skill or failed to exercise this degree of care; and

that, as a proximate result of this lack of knowledge or skill or the failure to exercise this degree of care, the plaintiff suffered injuries that would not otherwise have been incurred.

In malpractice actions there is no presumption of negligence on the part of the defendant.

In this section, “health care provider-patient relationship” means a relationship between a health care provider and a patient formed for the purpose of the health care provider providing examination, diagnosis, or treatment to the patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1967; am § 34 ch 102 SLA 1976; am §§ 1, 2 ch 24 SLA 2021)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2021 amendment, in (a), added (1), and redesignated existing paragraphs accordingly, made related and stylistic changes; added (c).

Sec. 09.55.544.
Evidence.

In a civil action or arbitration under AS

09.55.530

—

09.55.560

, notwithstanding AS

09.43.050

(2),

09.43.420(a)

, or

09.43.440(e)

, the following are not admissible as evidence:

an expression of apology, sympathy, commiseration, compassion, or benevolence made orally, by conduct, or in writing by a health care provider or an employee of a health care provider to a patient, the patient’s relative, or a legal representative of a patient concerning an unanticipated outcome of medical treatment or care regarding the patient’s discomfort, pain, suffering, injury, or death;

evidence of an offer made by a health care provider to a patient, the patient’s relative, or a legal representative of a patient to correct or remediate an unanticipated outcome of medical treatment or care;

evidence of conduct or statements by a health care provider to furnish, offer, accept, or promise to furnish or accept valuable consideration to compromise or attempt to compromise or settle a medical malpractice claim disputed as to validity or amount;

evidence of furnishing, offering, or promising to pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses, in full or in part, by a health care provider following an unanticipated outcome of medical treatment or care;

evidence of a health care provider requesting, demanding, inquiring, or directing another to write-off, offer, or promise to pay medical, hospital, or similar expenses, in whole or in part, following an unanticipated outcome of medical treatment or care.

If an expression of apology, sympathy, commiseration, compassion, or benevolence made under (a)(1) of this section is made in conjunction with an admission of liability or negligence, only the expression of apology, sympathy, commiseration, compassion, or benevolence is inadmissible, and the admission of liability or negligence may be admissible as evidence.

This section does not apply to an offer of judgment under AS

09.30.065

.

In this section,

“legal representative” means a legal guardian, attorney, person designated to make decisions on behalf of a patient under a power of attorney, or patient’s agent;

“relative” means

the spouse of the patient;

a parent, grandparent, stepparent, child, stepchild, grandchild, brother, sister, half brother, or half sister of the patient;

a parent of the patient’s spouse; or

an individual adopted by the patient.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 62, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 6, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 62, SLA 2014, this section applies “to causes of action that accrue on or after October 6, 2014.”

Sec. 09.55.545.
Agreement to correct unanticipated outcome or settle claim; legal advice.

An agreement to correct an unanticipated outcome of medical treatment or care or to settle a claim of medical malpractice made between a health care provider and a patient or the patient’s legal representative is voidable if the health care provider has not advised the patient or the patient’s legal representative in writing that the patient or the patient’s legal representative may seek legal advice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 62 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 62, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on October 6, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 3, ch. 62, SLA 2014, this section applies “to causes of action that accrue on or after October 6, 2014.”

Sec. 09.55.546.
Advance payments.

In an action to recover damages under AS

09.55.530

—

09.55.560

, no advance payment made by the defendant health care provider or the professional liability insurer of the defendant to or on behalf of the plaintiff is admissible as evidence or may be construed as an admission of liability for injuries or damages suffered by the plaintiff; however, a final award in favor of the plaintiff shall be reduced to the extent of any advance payment.
The advance payment shall inure to the exclusive benefit of the defendant or the insurer making the payment.

History.

(§ 35 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Sec. 09.55.547.
Pleading of damages.

In a cause of action against a health care provider for malpractice, the complaint or any other pleadings may not contain an ad damnum clause or monetary amount claimed against the defendant health care provider, except as necessary for jurisdictional purposes.

History.

(§ 35 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Sec. 09.55.548.
Awards, collateral source.

Damages shall be awarded in accordance with principles of the common law. The fact finder in a malpractice action shall render any award for damages by category of loss. The court may enter a judgment that future damages be paid in whole or in part by periodic payments rather than by a lump-sum payment; the judgment must include, if necessary, other provisions to assure that funds are available as periodic payments become due. Insurance from an authorized insurer as defined in AS

21.97.900

is sufficient assurance that funds will be available. Any part of the award that is paid on a periodic basis shall be adjusted annually according to changes in the consumer price index in the community where the claimant resides. In this subsection, “future damages” includes damages for future medical treatment, care or custody, loss of future earnings, or loss of bodily function of the claimant.

Except when the collateral source is a federal program that by law must seek subrogation and except death benefits paid under life insurance, a claimant may only recover damages from the defendant that exceed amounts received by the claimant as compensation for the injuries from collateral sources, whether private, group, or governmental, and whether contributory or noncontributory. Evidence of collateral sources, other than a federal program that must by law seek subrogation and the death benefit paid under life insurance, is admissible after the fact finder has rendered an award. The court may take into account the value of claimant’s rights to coverage exhausted or depleted by payment of these collateral benefits by adding back a reasonable estimate of their probable value, or by earmarking and holding for possible periodic payment under (a) of this section that amount of the award that would otherwise have been deducted, to see if the impairment of claimant’s rights actually takes place in the future.

History.

(§ 35 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (a), “AS

21.97.900

” was substituted for “AS

21.90.900

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

21.90.900

.

Sec. 09.55.549.
Limitation on damages from health care provider’s services.

Notwithstanding AS

09.17.010

, noneconomic damages for personal injury or death based on the provision of services by a health care provider may only be awarded as provided in this section.

In an action to recover damages for personal injury or wrongful death based on the provision of services by a health care provider, damages may include both economic and noneconomic damages.

Damage claims for noneconomic losses shall be limited to compensation for pain, suffering, inconvenience, physical impairment, disfigurement, loss of enjoyment of life, loss of consortium, and other nonpecuniary damage, but may not include hedonic damages.

Except as provided in (e) of this section, the damages awarded by a court or a jury under (c) of this section for all claims including a loss of consortium claim or other derivative claim arising out of a single injury may not exceed $250,000 regardless of the number of health care providers against whom the claim is asserted or the number of separate claims or causes of action brought with respect to the injury.

The damages awarded by a court or jury under (c) of this section for all claims including a loss of consortium claim or other derivative claim arising out of a single injury or death may not exceed $400,000 regardless of the number of health care providers against whom the claim is asserted or the number of separate claims or causes of action brought with respect to the injury or death when damages are awarded for wrongful death or severe permanent physical impairment that is more than 70 percent disabling.

The limitation on noneconomic damages in this section does not apply if the damages resulted from an act or omission that constitutes reckless or intentional misconduct.

Multiple injuries sustained by one person as a result of a single course of treatment shall be treated as a single injury for purposes of this section.

In this section,

“economic damages” means objectively verifiable monetary losses incurred as a result of the provision of, use of, or payment for, or failure to provide, use, or pay for health care services or medical products, and includes past and future medical expenses, loss of past and future earnings, cost of obtaining domestic services, burial expenses, loss of use of property, cost of replacement or repair, loss of employment, and loss of business or employment opportunities;

“health care provider” has the meaning given in AS

09.55.560

and includes a state agency or municipality the health care services of which are the subject of an action that is subject to this section;

“hedonic damages” means damages that attempt to compensate for the pleasure of being alive.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 2005)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 3, ch. 40, SLA 2005, provides that this section “applies to suits against health care providers and to malpractice claims that are subject to an agreement to arbitrate that initially accrue on or after September 5, 2005.”

Sec. 09.55.550.
Jury instructions.

In medical malpractice actions the jury shall be instructed that the plaintiff has the burden of proving the health care provider’s negligence or wilful misconduct in accordance with the standard of proof specified in AS

09.55.540

.
The jury shall be further instructed that injury alone does not raise a presumption of the health care provider’s negligence or misconduct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 49 SLA 1967; am § 36 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Sec. 09.55.554.
Immunity for oral contracts.

A cause of action against a health care provider does not arise for breach of an oral contract to provide a cure or achieve a specific medical result.

History.

(§ 37 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1994, “A cause of action against a health care provider does not arise” was substituted for “No cause of action against a health care provider arises” to conform the section to the current style of the Alaska Statutes.

Cross references. —

For other immunity provisions related to health care providers, see AS

09.65.090

,

09.65.091

and

09.65.095

.

Sec. 09.55.556.
Informed consent.

A health care provider is liable for failure to obtain the informed consent of a patient if the claimant establishes by a preponderance of the evidence that the provider has failed to inform the patient of the common risks and reasonable alternatives to the proposed treatment or procedure, and that but for that failure the claimant would not have consented to the proposed treatment or procedure.

It is a defense to any action for medical malpractice based upon an alleged failure to obtain informed consent that

the risk not disclosed is too commonly known or is too remote to require disclosure;

the patient stated to the health care provider that the patient would undergo the treatment or procedure regardless of the risk involved or that the patient did not want to be informed of the matters to which the patient would be entitled to be informed;

under the circumstances consent by or on behalf of the patient was not possible; or

the health care provider after considering all of the attendant facts and circumstances used reasonable discretion as to the manner and extent that the alternatives or risks were disclosed to the patient because the health care provider reasonably believed that a full disclosure would have a substantially adverse effect on the patient’s condition.

History.

(§ 37 ch 102 SLA 1976)

Sec. 09.55.560.
Definitions.

In AS

09.55.530

—

09.55.560

,

“board” means an arbitration board established under AS

09.55.535

;

“health care provider” means an acupuncturist licensed under AS 08.06; an audiologist or speech-language pathologist licensed under AS 08.11; a chiropractor licensed under AS 08.20; a dental hygienist licensed under AS 08.32; a dentist licensed under AS 08.36; a nurse licensed under AS 08.68; a dispensing optician licensed under AS 08.71; a naturopath licensed under AS 08.45; an optometrist licensed under AS 08.72; a pharmacist licensed under AS 08.80; a physical therapist or occupational therapist licensed under AS 08.84; a physician or physician assistant licensed under AS 08.64; a podiatrist; a psychologist and a psychological associate licensed under AS 08.86; a hospital as defined in AS

47.32.900

, including a governmentally owned or operated hospital; an employee of a health care provider acting within the course and scope of employment; an ambulatory surgical facility and other organizations whose primary purpose is the delivery of health care, including a health maintenance organization, individual practice association, integrated delivery system, preferred provider organization or arrangement, and a physical hospital organization;

“panel” means an expert advisory panel established under AS

09.55.536

;

“professional negligence” means a negligent act or omission by a health care provider in rendering professional services;

“professional services” means service provided by a health care provider that is within the scope of services for which the health care provider is licensed and that is not prohibited under the health care provider’s license or by a facility in which the health care provider practices.

History.

(§ 37 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 9 ch 131 SLA 1986; § 26 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 9 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 14 SLA 1991; am §§ 26, 27 ch 26 SLA 1997; am § 19 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2006, the definitions of “board” and “health care provider” were reversed to maintain alphabetical order.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent relating to the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 1, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.
For severability of the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997, see § 56, ch. 26, SLA 1997 in the 1997 Temporary and Special Acts.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 55, ch. 26, SLA 1997 provides that the provisions of ch. 26, SLA 1997 apply “to all causes of action accruing on or after August 7, 1997.”